District of Columbia statutes.
2-1541

Findings and purpose.

(a)

The Council of the District of Columbia (“Council”) has determined that there has been an increase in juvenile violence, juvenile gang activity, and crime by persons under the age of 17 years in the District of Columbia.

(b)

The Council has determined that persons under the age of 17 years are particularly susceptible, because of their lack of maturity and experience, to participate in unlawful and gang-related activities and to be the victims of older perpetrators of crime.

(c)

The Council has an obligation to provide for the protection of minors from each other and from other persons, for the enforcement of parental control over, and responsibility for, children, for the protection of the general public, and for the reduction of the incidence of juvenile criminal activities.

(d)

The Council has determined that a curfew for those under the age of 17 years will be in the interest of the public health, safety, and general welfare and will help to attain these objectives and to diminish the undesirable impact of this conduct on the citizens of the District of Columbia.

(e)

The Council determines that passage of a curfew law will protect the welfare of minors by:

(1)

Reducing the likelihood that minors will be the victims of criminal acts during the curfew hours;

(2)

Reducing the likelihood that minors will become involved in criminal acts or exposed to narcotics trafficking during the curfew hours; and

(3)

Aiding parents or guardians in carrying out their responsibility to exercise reasonable supervision of minors entrusted to their care.

History

Sept. 20, 1995, D.C. Law 11-48, § 2, 42 DCR 3627

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2181.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of § 6(b) of Law 11-48, see § 2 of Juvenile Curfew and Retired Police Officer Redeployment Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-45, February 26, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 1506).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of § 6(b) of Law 11-48, see § 2 of Juvenile Curfew Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-128, June 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6499).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal expiration of this subchapter, see § 2 of the Juvenile Curfew and Retired Police Officer Redeployment Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-148, September 15, 1997, 44 DCR 5461).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of expiration of this subchapter, see § 2 of the Juvenile Curfew Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-345, April 27, 1998, 45 DCR 4616).